Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.195

Violation of injunction—Penalty.

A person or business that violates an injunction issued under this chapter shall pay a civil penalty, as determined by the court, of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, which shall be placed in the health professions account. For the purpose of this section, the superior court issuing any injunction shall retain jurisdiction and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for the recovery of civil penalties.

[ 1987 c 150 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.